Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3575] THE HOME-BASED BUSINESS FAIRNESS ACT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Goods" means any merchandise, equipment, products, supplies, or materials. new text end new text begin (c) "Home-based business" means any business for the manufacture, provision, or sale of goods or services that is owned and operated by the owner or tenant of the residential dwelling. new text end new text begin (d) "No-impact home-based business" means a home-based business for which all of the following apply: new text end new text begin (1) the total number of on-site employees and clients does not exceed the municipal occupancy limit for the residential property; and new text end new text begin (2) the business activities are characterized by all of the following: new text end new text begin (i) are limited to the sale of lawful goods and services; new text end new text begin (ii) do not generate on-street parking or a substantial increase in traffic through the residential area; new text end new text begin (iii) occur inside the residential dwelling or in the yard; and new text end new text begin (iv) are not visible from the street. new text end new text begin (e) "Residential dwelling" has the meaning provided in section 326B.163, subdivision 19. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Permitted use of residential dwelling for home-based business. new text end new text begin (a) The use of a residential dwelling for a home-based business is a permitted use, except that this authority does not supersede any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) any deed restriction, covenant, or agreement restricting the use of land; or new text end new text begin (2) any master deed, bylaw, or other document applicable to a common interest ownership community. new text end new text begin (b) A municipality must not require an application, registration, or any permit, license, variance, or other type of prior approval for a no-impact home-based business to operate in the municipality. new text end new text begin (c) A municipality may establish reasonable regulations on a home-based business if the regulations are narrowly tailored for any of the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) protecting public health and safety, including establishing rules and regulations related to fire and building codes, health and sanitation, transportation or traffic control, solid or hazardous waste, pollution, and noise control; new text end new text begin (2) ensuring the business activity is: new text end new text begin (i) compatible with residential use of the property and surrounding residential use; new text end new text begin (ii) secondary to the use as a residential dwelling; and new text end new text begin (iii) complying with state and federal law and paying applicable taxes; or new text end new text begin (3) limiting or prohibiting the use of a home-based business for the purposes of selling illegal drugs, liquor, operating or maintaining a structured sober living home, pornography, obscenity, nude or topless dancing, and other adult-oriented businesses. new text end new text begin (d) A municipality must not condition the operation of a home-based business on a requirement for a person to: new text end new text begin (1) rezone the property for commercial use; or new text end new text begin (2) install or equip fire sprinklers in a single-family detached residential dwelling or any residential dwelling with not more than two dwelling units. new text end new text begin (e) The question of whether a regulation complies with this section is a judicial question and a municipality that enacts a regulation under this section must establish by clear and convincing evidence that the regulation complies with this section. new text end